Utah statutes.
75-3-106.   Scope of proceedings -- Proceedings independent -- Exception.

(1) Unless supervised administration as described in Part 5 of this chapter is involved:

(a)  Each proceeding before the court or registrar is independent of any other proceeding involving the same estate.

(b)  Petitions for formal orders of the court may combine various requests for relief in a single proceeding if the orders sought may be finally granted without delay. Except as required for proceedings which are particularly described by other sections of this chapter, no petition is defective because it fails to embrace all matters which might then be the subject of a final order.

(c)  Proceedings for probate of wills or adjudications of no will may be combined with proceedings for appointment of personal representatives.

(d)  A proceeding for appointment of a personal representative is concluded by an order making or declining the appointment.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

